Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202214-224
City council, officers, employees; receipt or solicitation of gifts; violations; penalty.

The mayor and city council members and all other officers, agents, and employees of a city of the metropolitan class are prohibited from soliciting or receiving, directly or indirectly, for any purpose whatsoever, any contribution of money or supplies of whatsoever kind, or any valuable or special privilege at the hands of any city contractor, or his or her agents, or from any franchised municipal corporation. Such conduct shall constitute malfeasance in office. No officer, appointee, agent, or employee shall directly or indirectly solicit or receive any gift or contribution of money or supplies, or any valuable service, from any appointee, agent, or employee of such city, for the benefit of the person asking for such gift or contribution or for the benefit of another. A violation of this section is a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. II, § 22, p. 431;

C.S.1922, § 3548;

C.S.1929, § 14-223;

R.S.1943, § 14-224;

Laws 1979, LB 80, § 13;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 54.
July 21, 2022
This section condemns the action of the city official and not the donor to a fund with which the city may acquire by gift real estate for establishing parks and playgrounds. Ash v. City of Omaha, 152 Neb. 393, 41 N.W.2d 386 (1950).

This section condemns the act of the city official, and not the purpose of the donor. Reid v. City of Omaha, 150 Neb. 286, 34 N.W.2d 375 (1948).